Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Financial Matters

7-57-401. Annual report by trustees — Budgets, preparation, hearings and approvals.

The board of trustees of each authority created under this chapter shall file an annual report with the governing body or bodies of the creating and participating municipalities of the authority for the fiscal year. The board shall also prepare and submit to the creating and participating municipalities at such times and in such form as they shall specify an annual operating budget, a capital budget, and a five-year capital improvement program. The creating and participating municipalities shall hold a public hearing on such budgets, and representatives of the board of trustees shall be present. After such hearing, the creating and participating municipalities in accordance with their contract with the authority shall determine the amount of appropriation they shall make for the operation of the authority's hospital facilities and for any capital expenditures for the purchase, construction, expansion or improvement of any hospital project or other facility constructed, maintained and operated by the authority, and shall approve an annual operating budget, a capital budget, and a five-year capital improvement program. If a creating or participating municipality makes no contribution to the annual operating budget or to the capital budget, then its approval of the budgets shall no longer be required pursuant to this section.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 15; T.C.A., § 6-4018.

Cross-References. Audit of financial affairs required at end of each fiscal year, §7-57-402.

7-57-402. Annual audit.

Any hospital authority created by and under this chapter shall conduct an annual audit of the financial affairs, books and records of such authority, the audit to be at the end of each fiscal year. Each hospital authority shall obtain either a certified public accountant or a firm of certified public accountants to conduct such audit. The auditor so appointed shall make the audit provided for in this section in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and shall submit the complete and final report and audit to such authority not later than ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year. All audits provided for in this section shall be certified to and shall include, but in no way be limited to, a full and complete audit containing a balance sheet, profit and loss statement and statement of receipts and disbursements, and shall certify whether or not the authority has operated within its approved annual operating budget and capital budget.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 16; T.C.A., § 6-4019.

Cross-References. Failure to comply with audit requirements, §7-57-404.

7-57-403. Publication of audits.

All final audits as provided for in §7-57-402 shall be reproduced in sufficient numbers and copies, and shall be submitted to and filed with the governing bodies of each creating and participating municipality of the authority not later than ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year of the authority.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 17; T.C.A., § 6-4020.

7-57-404. Failure to conduct audit — Court order — Contempt.

In the event any hospital authority shall fail or refuse to provide for an annual audit and have such audit prepared and filed as set forth in §§7-57-402 and7-57-403, or should such audit fail to certify whether or not the hospital authority has operated within its approved annual operating budget and capital budget, the governing body or governing bodies of any creating or participating municipality of such authority may petition the circuit or chancery court of the county wherein the authority operates a hospital to require the authority to have such audit and certification prepared and filed as provided in §§7-57-402 and7-57-403. The judge of the court shall set a time for the hearing of such petition and after notice to the authority shall hear and determine the petition. In the event it is determined that the authority has failed to comply with the provisions relative to the preparation and filing of the audit and certification, the judge shall pass such orders as are necessary to effectuate compliance with the provisions. In the event the authority fails to have an audit and certification prepared and filed as required by the court order, the members of the authority shall be subject to contempt proceedings by the court as provided by law.

Acts 1971, ch. 316, § 18; T.C.A., § 6-4021.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.